Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1817
Compensation awarded; collateral compensation; how treated.

(1) The committee or a hearing officer may award compensation for losses and expenses allowable under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act for which the applicant is not compensated by the offender or a person on behalf of the offender, by the United States, by a state or any of its subdivisions or agencies, or by a private source of emergency awards under section 81-1820, for injury or death compensable under such act. Life insurance proceeds and social security payments shall not be treated as forms of such collateral compensation.

(2) If compensation is awarded under the act and the person receiving it also receives a collateral sum under the act which has not been deducted from it, he or she shall refund to the committee either the amount of the collateral sum or the amount of compensation paid to him or her under the act, whichever is less.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 18.

Social Security payment to aid dependent children who lost support of their mother not treated as form of collateral compensation when the board considers all relevant circumstances. Lambert v. Nebraska Cr. Vict. Rep. Bd., 214 Neb. 817, 336 N.W.2d 320 (1983).